Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201668-1919
Reduction of quality assurance assessment;
when.

The
department shall reduce the quality assurance assessment for either certain
high-volume medicaid nursing facilities or skilled nursing facilities with
high patient volumes to meet the redistribution tests in 42 C.F.R. 433.68(e)(2).
Under this section, the assessment shall be based on total resident days,
including bed-hold days, less medicare days, for the purpose of improving
the quality of nursing facility or skilled nursing facility care in this state.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 19.